Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-710
Records; maintenance and retention.

Beginning on July 19, 1996, a museum shall at a minimum maintain and retain the following records, either as originals or accurate copies, for a period of not less than twenty-five years:

(1) A notice of intent to preserve an interest in property, if any;

(2) The loan agreement, if any;

(3) A receipt or ledger for property delivered to an owner or claimant; and

(4) Records containing the following information, as available, for property in the museum's possession:

(a) The lender's name, address, and telephone number;

(b) The claimant's name, address, and telephone number;

(c) The donor's name, address, and telephone number;

(d) The seller's name, address, and telephone number;

(e) The nature and terms of the transaction (loan for specified term, loan for unspecified term, donation, purchase, etc.); and

(f) The beginning date of the loan period or transaction date.

Laws 1996, LB 1276, § 10.